Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2901
Act, how cited.

Sections 21-2901 to 21-29,134 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB848, § 1.